Hawaii statutes.
E. Hawaii Research Center for Futures Study

[§304A-3251] Center established. There
is hereby established a Hawaii research center for futures study. The center
is assigned to the university for administrative purposes. [L 2006, c 75, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next